Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 8, chapter 87, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1) For the biennium ending June 30, 2019, at  the request of the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services, after the department consults with the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560  to
286A.585 in an amount that  produces $9 million in net proceeds and interest earnings for the pur-
poses described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an  additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section in an amount sufficient to provide
$9 million in net proceeds and interest earnings must be transferred to the Higher Education Co-
ordinating Commission for deposit in the  [ Public University Fund established under ORS 352.450,
segregated in a distinct subaccount to allow  necessary compliance with the Internal Revenue Code ]
EOU Field House Facility Fund, established under  section 2 of this 2019 Act , for distribution
to Eastern Oregon University to construct a new field house facility.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or restore  and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) A new facility is needed in order  for the university to have adequate instructional and ath-
letic space.
(b) Having adequate university buildings and facilities is essential to Oregon’s healthy  economic
growth.
(c) The field house facility will be used as a venue  for regional events, providing significant
economic benefits to local communities.
(d) Oregon manufactured wood products, including cross-laminated timber, will be  utilized in the
construction of the field house facility, supporting Oregon’s wood products manufacturing industry.
SECTION 2.
(1) The EOU Field House Facility Fund is established in  the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on  the moneys in the EOU
Field House Facility Fund must be credited to the fund. The fund consists  of moneys depos-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 1
ited in the fund under section 8, chapter 87, Oregon Laws 2018, and may include moneys ap-
propriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative  Assembly or
otherwise and interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission for the purposes specified in section 8, chapter 87, Oregon Laws 2018.
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Department  of Administrative Services may expend up to
$533,000 of  net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pursuant to section 1, chapter 614, Oregon
Laws 2011, for distribution to the Cascade AIDS Project  for the purposes described in section
12, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017.
SECTION 4.  Section 12, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 12.  (1) For the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the Cascade AIDS Project, the  State
Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount
that produces , together with the  amount distributed by the department under section 3 of this
2019 Act, no more than  $1 million in net proceeds and  interest earnings for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer to  be
necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section in an amount sufficient to provide
$1 million in net proceeds and interest earnings must be transferred to the department for  deposit
in the ODAS Economic Development Distributions Fund established under ORS 461.553 for distrib-
ution to the Cascade AIDS Project for acquisition  and renovation of a primary care and mental
health center for  the lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, and other minority gender identities
and sexual orientation community.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Individuals increase their  potential for self-sufficiency and use fewer public resources when
they have access to health care.
(b) Individuals who have mental illnesses increase their potential for  self-sufficiency and use
fewer public resources when they have access to mental health services.
SECTION 5.
 Section 15, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 15.  (1) For the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Family Nurturing Center [ Rogue
Valley Children’s Relief Nursery ], the State Treasurer is authorized to  issue lottery bonds pursuant
to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an  amount that produces $2 million in net proceeds and interest
earnings for the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount es-
timated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section in an amount sufficient to provide
$2 million in net proceeds and interest earnings must be transferred to the department for  deposit
in the ODAS Economic Development Distributions Fund established under ORS 461.553 for distrib-
ution to the Family Nurturing Center [ Rogue Valley Children’s Relief Nursery to purchase and re-
habilitate affordable housing adjacent to the Family Nurturing Center Campus ] to build or redevelop
affordable housing units serving seniors and families with young children .
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Having housing for at-risk populations is essential to Oregon’s healthy economic growth.
(b) A severe shortage of affordable housing exists in Oregon, and market  indicators demonstrate
a growing gap between the supply of and demand for affordable housing.
SECTION 6.
 Section 29, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 29.  (1) For the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after  the department consults with the Oregon Business Development
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 2
Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS  286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces $3,390,000  in net proceeds and interest earnings for the pur-
poses described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an  additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section in an amount sufficient to provide
$3,390,000 in net proceeds and interest earnings must be transferred to the Oregon  Business Devel-
opment Department for deposit in the American Manufacturing  Innovation District Fund established
in section 7a, chapter 66, Oregon Laws 2016, for construction of [ access roads  to the ] Oregon Man-
ufacturing Innovation Center [ Research and Development Facility and Training Center] access
roads.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bonds proceeds with create jobs  and
further economic development, and is authorized based on the finding  that the Oregon Manufactur-
ing Innovation Center will enable and encourage the development of a robust manufacturing sector
in the Oregon economy.
SECTION 7.
 Section 1, chapter 570, Oregon Laws 2017, as amended by section  1, chapter 87,
Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  The amounts authorized,  as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of general obligation
bonds of the state during the 2017-2019 biennium, notwithstanding  section 10, chapter 705, Oregon
Laws 2013, are as follows:
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS
General Fund Obligations
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-G):
(a) Oregon Institute of
Technology, Center for
Excellence in Engineering
and Technology/Cornett
Hall Renovation ............................ $ 2,050,000
(b) Oregon State University:
[(A) Quality Foods and Beverage ]
[Center.............................................$ 9,100,000]
(A) Dairy Products Pilot Plant ... $ 3,055,000
(B) Gilkey Hall Renovation .............. $ 2,050,000
(C) Cascades Academic
Building 2 .......................................$ 10,215,000
(c) Portland State University,
Graduate School of
Education Facility ....................... $ 36,485,000
(d) University of Oregon,
Campus for Accelerating
Scientific Impact .......................... $ 70,910,000
(e) Western Oregon University:
(A) Information Technology
Center Renovation ....................... $ 540,000
(B) Oregon Military Building
Renovation ..................................... $ 540,000
(f) Blue Mountain Community
College, Facility for
Agricultural Resource
Management .................................. $ 5,115,000
(g) Chemeketa Community
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 3
College, Agricultural
Complex ..........................................$ 6,125,000
(h) Clackamas Community College:
(A) DeJardin Building Addition ....... $ 8,140,000
(B) Student Services and
Community Commons .................. $ 8,140,000
(i) Clatsop Community College,
[Marine Science Center ]
[Renovation and Expansion ........ $ 8,135,000]
Maritime Science Building .... $ 8,135,000
(j) Columbia Gorge Community
College, Middle College
Prototype Facility ........................ $ 7,400,000
(k) Lane Community College,
Health Care Village Facility ..... $ 8,140,000
(L) Linn-Benton Community
College, Student Advising
and Campus Safety Center ........ $ 7,635,000
(m) Mt. Hood Community College,
Maywood Park Center ................ $ 8,140,000
(n) Oregon Coast Community
College, Workforce Education
and Resiliency Center ................. $ 8,140,000
(o) Portland Community College,
Health Technology
Building Renovation .................... $ 8,140,000
(p) Rogue Community College,
[Elk Building Science Facility ]
[Renovation and Expansion ........ $ 6,125,000]
Redwood Campus Science
Facility.................................. $ 6,125,000
(q) Southwestern Oregon
Community College,
Dellwood Hall Remodel and
Expansion .......................................$ 2,805,000
(r) Treasure Valley Community
College, Workforce
Vocational Center ........................ $ 2,865,000
(s) Umpqua Community College,
Industrial Technology
Building ..........................................$ 8,140,000
(2) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ....................... $ 10,300,000
(3) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-M) .............. $ 101,180,000
(4) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-N) ............... $ 20,430,000
(5) Department of Education
(Art. XI-P) ......................................$ 100,985,000
(6) Oregon Department of
Administrative
Services (Art. XI-Q):
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 4
(a) Department of Corrections:
(A) Capital Improvements and
Renewal ..........................................$ 26,770,000
(B) Technology Infrastructure ......... $ 12,445,000
(b) Department of Education,
Oregon School for the Deaf
Facility Improvements ................ $ 4,365,000
(c) Department of Environmental
Quality, Environmental Data
Management System .................... $ 5,070,000
(d) Department of Human
Services, ONE Integrated
Eligibility and Medicaid
Eligibility System ......................... $ 34,045,000
(e) Department of Justice,
Child Support Enforcement
Automated System ....................... $ 19,400,000
(f) Department of Revenue,
Core Tax Revenue Systems
Replacement .................................. $ 4,855,000
(g) Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
(A) Lebanon Veteran’s Home
Parking Lot ................................... $ 1,345,000
(B) The Dalles Veterans’ Home
Capital Improvements ................. $ 1,195,000
(C) Roseburg Veterans’ Home .......... $ 10,720,000
(h) Housing and Community
Services Department, Local
Innovation and Fast Track
Housing Program ......................... $ 81,090,000
(i) Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
(A) Public Universities Capital
Improvement and Renewal ......... $ 50,620,000
(B) Eastern Oregon University,
Loso Hall Renovation ................. $ 5,575,000
(C) Oregon Institute of
Technology:
(i) Center for Excellence in
Engineering and Technology/
Cornett Hall Renovation ............ $ 38,475,000
(ii) Oregon Manufacturing
Innovation Center, Research
and Development Facility .......... $ 3,940,000
(D) Oregon State University:
(i) Cordley Hall Renovation ............ $ 15,250,000
(ii) Fairbanks Hall Renovation ........ $ 11,220,000
(iii) Gilkey Hall Renovation .............. $ 1,045,000
(iv) Cascades Expansion Site
Reclamation ................................... $ 9,145,000
(v) Cascades Academic
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 5
Building 2.......................................$ 29,410,000
(E) Portland State University,
Graduate School of
Education Facility ....................... $ 9,145,000
(F) Southern Oregon
University:
(i) Central Hall Capital
Improvements ................................ $ 6,125,000
(ii) Boiler Replacement ...................... $ 2,855,000
(G) Western Oregon University:
(i) Information Technology
Center Renovation ....................... $ 5,070,000
(ii) Oregon Military Building
Renovation ..................................... $ 7,335,000
(j) Legislative Administration
Committee, Capitol
Accessibility, Maintenance,
and Safety ......................................$ 23,660,000
(k) Oregon Judicial Department:
(A) Lane County Courthouse ........... $ 5,115,000
(B) Multnomah County
Courthouse ..................................... $ 102,495,000
(C) Oregon Supreme Court
Building Renovation .................... $ 6,125,000
(L) Oregon Military Department:
(A) Grants Pass Armory
Service Life Extension ................ $ 3,330,000
(B) Regional Armory Emergency
Enhancement Project .................. $ 8,675,000
(C) Regional Training Institute ....... $ 6,630,000
(D) Resiliency Grant Fund ................ $ 5,070,000
(E) Youth Challenge Armory ........... $ 5,095,000
(m) Oregon Youth Authority:
(A) Capital Improvements ................. $ 17,450,000
(B) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovation ..................................... $ 15,450,000
(C) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements ................................ $ 7,095,000
(n) State Department of Fish
and Wildlife ................................... $ 10,215,000
(o) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement ..... $ 774,225
Dedicated Fund Obligations
(7) Department of Veterans’
Affairs (Art. XI-A) ........................ $ 120,000,000
(8) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-F(1)):
(a) Portland State University:
(A) Land Acquisition for
University Center Building ........ $ 15,260,000
(B) 12th & Market
Residence Hall .............................. $ 54,225,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 6
(C) Graduate School of
Education Facility ....................... $ 6,080,000
(D) Corbett Building Purchase ......... $ 5,100,000
(b) Oregon Institute of
Technology, Student
Recreation Center ........................ $ 5,115,000
(c) Eastern Oregon University,
Track and Field Facilities
Restoration .................................... $ 1,180,000
(d) Western Oregon University,
Natural Sciences Building
Renovation ..................................... $ 3,560,000
(9) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ....................... $ 10,000,000
(10) Housing and Community
Services Department
(Art. XI-I(2)) ................................... $ 25,000,000
(11) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
(Art. XI-Q):
(a) Portland State Office
Building Improvements ............... $ 13,360,000
(b) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement ..... $ 1,075,775
Total General Obligation
[Bonds .............................................$ 1,341,615,000]
Bonds ....................................  $ 1,335,570,000
SECTION 8.  Section 2, chapter 570, Oregon Laws 2017, as amended by section  2, chapter 87,
Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  The amounts authorized, as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance  of revenue bonds
of the state during the 2017-2019 biennium are as follows:
REVENUE BONDS
Direct Revenue Bonds
Housing and Community
Services Department ................... $ 400,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department .................................... $ 30,000,000
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services,
[Lottery Revenue Bonds .............. $ 221,025,000]
Lottery Revenue Bonds ........ $ 217,670,000
Total Direct Revenue
[Bonds .............................................$ 651,025,000]
Bonds .................................... $ 647,670,000
Pass-Through Revenue Bonds
Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds ..................... $ 400,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 7
Program ..........................................$ 10,000,000
Oregon Facilities Authority ...... $ 1,350,000,000
Housing and Community
Services Department ................... $ 600,000,000
Total Pass-Through Revenue
Bonds ..............................................$ 2,360,000,000
[Total Revenue Bonds ............................ $ 3,011,025,000]
Total Revenue Bonds .................... $ 3,007,670,000
SECTION 9. Section 10, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, is repealed.
SECTION 10.  ORS 274.064 is amended to read:
274.064. (1) The Portland Harbor Cleanup  Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the  General Fund. Interest earned by the Portland Harbor Cleanup Fund must
be credited to  the fund.  The Portland Harbor Cleanup Fund consists of  all  moneys [ deposited in
the fund under section 10, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, ] credited to the fund  and may  include
moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund  by the Legislative Assembly or
otherwise and interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of  State Lands for
[disbursement for the purposes set forth in section 10, chapter 748, Oregon  Laws 2017 ] costs relating
to or arising out of the Portland Harbor Superfund Site .
(3) Nothing in this section or [ section 10, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, ] any other law that
appropriates, allocates, deposits or transfers moneys to the fund  waives or  limits the
department’s ability to recover, by way of  insurance, cost recovery, contribution, or claim or action
relating to or arising out of the Portland Harbor Superfund Site, moneys from  other parties, in-
cluding claims for costs incurred  by the department. In no event shall anything in this section or
[section 10, chapter  748, Oregon Laws 2017, ] any other law that appropriates, allocates, deposits
or transfers moneys to the fund  be construed as a waiver by the State of Oregon of any form of
defense or immunity, whether sovereign  immunity, governmental immunity, immunity based on the
Eleventh Amendment to the United States Constitution or otherwise.
SECTION 11. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 8
Passed by Senate March 12, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House April 1, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 9